Utah statutes.
48-2c-902.   Assessments for additional contributions.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of organization, operating agreement, or other writing binding on the members, no additional contributions shall be required of any member and no member shall be subject to assessment for additional contributions to the company.  Nevertheless, where an assessment obligation is provided for, the obligation shall not be construed as conferring any rights upon any creditor or upon any person not a party to the operating agreement.

